Idaho, session 2026, S1436.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-9224, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9224. COOPERATIVE AND GROUP DISCOUNT PURCHASING. (1) The
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the adminis-
trator may authorize an agency to:
(a) Become a participating member of a group discount purchasing organ-
ization;
(b) Participate in, sponsor, conduct or administer a cooperative pur-
chasing agreement for property with one (1) or more public agencies, in-
dependent of the requirements of section 67-2329, Idaho Code; or
(c) Utilize contracts of other public agencies within this state upon
determining that the contract was let in a manner that constitutes com-
petitive bidding consistent with the requirements of this chapter and
is otherwise in the best interest of the state.
(2) Any contracts entered into pursuant to subsection (1) of this sec-
tion may include modifications to address additional needs of the state if
the administrator determines the modifications are in the best interest of
the state. The administrator shall inform the vendor of the manner in which
the state may request modifications prior to entering such contract.
(2) (3) The state's participation in a cooperative purchase or group
discount purchasing organization must be formalized by a written agreement.
(3) (4) The state's entrance fee or participation fee in a group dis-
count purchasing organization must be based on criteria applied to all other
members of the organization.
(4) (5) Any agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (2) (3) of
this section shall be maintained on file with the division as well as with the
agency entering into the agreement.
(6) The legislature finds and declares that group discount purchasing,
cooperative purchasing, and shared contracts reduce administrative burden
to the state by requiring fewer solicitations. The legislature further
finds and declares that group discount purchasing, cooperative purchasing,
and shared contracts may enable the state to procure property for reduced
cost. It is the intent of the legislature to authorize such activities in a
manner that allows flexibility to modify underlying contracts when the modi-
fication, in the administrator's judgment, would serve the best interest of
the state.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.